District of Columbia statutes.
6-1004

Community Development Program — Implementation.

(a)

After the approval of a Community Development Program by the Council pursuant to § 6-1002, the Mayor is authorized to submit to the Secretary of Housing and Urban Development an application, meeting the requirements of the Housing and Community Development Act of 1974 and regulations issued pursuant thereto or amendments thereof, for financial assistance to implement said program. In connection therewith, the Mayor is authorized to:

(1)

Consent to assume the status of a responsible federal official under the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 [42 U.S.C. § 4321 et seq.];

(2)

Consent, on behalf of the District government and himself, to accept the jurisdiction of the federal courts for the purpose of enforcement of his responsibilities as such an official;

(3)

Give such other pledges, assurances, and certifications as may be required by the Housing and Community Development Act of 1974 and regulations issued pursuant thereto or amendments thereof; and

(4)

Accept grants, gifts, donations, bequests, and services from any source to assist in carrying out any of the purposes of this subchapter.

(b)

In implementing an approved Community Development Program the Mayor is authorized to perform or conduct any of the activities described in § 6-1003 and to do all other things necessary to carry out the intent of such program in accordance with any existing provisions of law not inconsistent herewith. Any power granted to the Mayor or any officer, employee, agency, or instrumentality of the District government by any other law may, in addition to the purposes specified therein, be exercised in furtherance of the carrying out of an approved Community Development Program.

(c)

Powers and functions vested in the Mayor by this subchapter may be delegated by him to any officer, employee, agency, or instrumentality of the District government by administrative order, and any officer, employee, agency, or instrumentality so designated is authorized to perform the same in accordance with the terms of the delegation.

(d)

The Mayor is authorized to issue, amend, and revoke such rules and regulations as he deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this subchapter.

(e)

Under the Community Development Program, the Mayor may offer Community Development Program loans for sale on the secondary market in order to generate additional funds to make more loans available to low-and moderate-income persons.

(f)

(1)

The sale of mortgages under this section shall be confined, so far as practicable, to mortgages which are deemed by the Mayor to be of such quality, type, and class as to meet, generally, the purchase standards imposed by private institutional mortgage investors. The establishment of the sale price in the secondary market shall be consistent with the expectation that such sale be effected only at such price and on such terms as will reasonably prevent excessive loss to the District government and prevent excessive use of the District’s assets.

(2)

The establishment of the sale price shall be submitted to the Council for a 14-day period of review, excluding days of Council recess, beginning on the day that the resolution is transmitted by the Mayor and received by the Chairman of the Council. To initiate a disapproval of the sale price submitted to the Council, a member of the Council shall, within the 14-day period, file a written notice of disapproval with the Secretary to the Council. If this notice is given, the Council may consider and take final action to disapprove the resolution within 30 days after the notice has been filed. If the Council does not adopt a resolution disapproving the established sale price, then the resolution will be deemed approved.

Dec. 16, 1975, D.C. Law 1-39, § 5, 22 DCR 3448
June 11, 1999, D.C. Law 13-9, § 2(e), 46 DCR 3640

The Housing and Community Development Act of 1974, referred to in the first sentence in the introductory paragraph and in paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of this section, is the Act of August 22, 1974, 88 Stat. 633, Pub. L. 93-383.

The National Environmental Policy Act of 1969, referred to in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this section, is the Act of January 1, 1970, 83 Stat. 852, Pub. L. 91-190.

For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(e) of the Community Development Program Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-61, May 10, 1999, 46 DCR 4451).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(e) of the Community Development Program Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-557, January 12, 1999, 45 DCR 635).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(e) of Community Development Program Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-246, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4159).
D.C. Law 13-9 added subsecs. (e) and (f).
1973 Ed., § 5-1004.
1981 Ed., § 5-904.